Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.26.050

Permissible purpose.

(1) A special deposit must serve at least one permissible purpose stated in the account agreement from the time the special deposit is created in the account agreement until termination of the special deposit.

(2) If, before termination of the special deposit, the bank or a court determines the special deposit no longer satisfies subsection (1) of this section, RCW 30A.26.070 through 30A.26.100 cease to apply to any funds deposited in the special deposit after the special deposit ceases to satisfy subsection (1) of this section.

(3) If, before termination of a special deposit, the bank determines the special deposit no longer satisfies subsection (1) of this section, the bank may take action it believes is necessary under the circumstances, including terminating the special deposit.

[ 2024 c 23 s 6.]